Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 15. New Hampshire-Vermont Interstate School Compact
§ 777.
Borrowing—Article VII.

Interstate District Indebtedness. Indebtedness of an interstate district shall be a general obligation of the district and shall also be a joint and several general obligation of each member district, except that such obligations of the district and its member districts shall not be deemed indebtedness of any member district for the purposes of determining its borrowing capacity under New Hampshire or Vermont law. A member district which withdraws from an interstate district shall remain liable for indebtedness of the interstate district which is outstanding at the time of withdrawal and shall be responsible for paying its share of such indebtedness to the same extent as though it had not been withdrawn.

Temporary Borrowing. The interstate board may authorize the borrowing of money by the interstate district (1) in anticipation of payments of operating and capital expenses by the member districts to the interstate districts and (2) in anticipation of the issue of bonds or notes of the interstate district which have been authorized for the purpose of financing capital projects. Such temporary borrowing shall be evidenced by interest bearing or discounted notes of the interstate district. The amount of notes issued in any fiscal year in anticipation of expense payments shall not exceed the amount of such payments received by the interstate district in the preceding fiscal year. Notes issued under this paragraph shall be payable within one year in the case of notes under clause (1) and three years in the case of notes under clause (2) from their respective dates, but the principal of and interest on notes issued for a shorter period may be renewed or paid from time to time by the issue of other notes, provided that the period from the date of an original note to the maturity of any note issued to renew or pay the same debt shall not exceed the maximum period permitted for the original loan.

Borrowing for Capital Projects. An interstate district may incur debt and issue its bonds or notes to finance capital projects. Such projects may consist of the acquisition or improvement of land and buildings for school purposes, the construction, reconstruction, alteration, or enlargement of school buildings and related school facilities, the acquisition of equipment of a lasting character and the payment of judgments. No interstate district may authorize indebtedness in excess of ten percent of the total fair market value of taxable property in its member districts as defined in article VI of this compact. The primary obligation of the interstate district to pay indebtedness of member districts shall not be considered indebtedness of the interstate district for the purpose of determining its borrowing capacity under this paragraph. Bonds or notes issued under this paragraph shall mature in equal or diminishing installments of principal payable at least annually commencing no later than two years and ending not later than thirty years after their dates.

Authorization Proceedings. An interstate district shall authorize the incurring of debts to finance capital projects by a majority vote of the district passed at an annual or special district meeting. Such vote shall be taken by secret ballot after full opportunity for debate, and any such vote shall be subject to reconsideration and further action by the district at the same meeting or at an adjourned session thereof. As an alternative, an interstate district may provide in its articles of agreement that such a vote be conducted by Australian or official balloting under procedures as set forth in the articles of agreement, and that such vote be subject to any method of reconsideration, if any, the interstate district sets forth in the articles of agreement.

Sale of Bonds and Notes. Bonds and notes which have been authorized under this article may be issued from time to time and shall be sold at not less than par and accrued interest at public or private sale by the chairman of the school board and by the treasurer. Interstate district bonds and notes shall be signed by the said officers, except that either one of the two required signatures may be a facsimile. Subject to this compact and the authorizing vote, they shall be in such form, bear such rates of interest and mature at such times as the said officers may determine. Bonds shall, but notes need not, bear the seal of the interstate district, or a facsimile of such seal. Any bonds or notes of the interstate district which are properly executed by the said officers shall be valid and binding according to their terms notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof such officers may have ceased to be officers of the interstate district.

Proceeds of Bonds. Any accrued interest received upon delivery of bonds or notes of an interstate district shall be applied to the payment of the first interest which becomes due thereon. The other proceeds of the sale of such bonds or notes, other than temporary notes, including any premiums, may be temporarily invested by the interstate district pending their expenditure; and such proceeds, including any income derived from the temporary investment of such proceeds, shall be used to pay the costs of issuing and marketing the bonds or notes and to meet the operating expenses or capital expenses in accordance with the purposes for which the bonds or notes were issued or, by proceedings taken in the manner required for the authorization of such debt, for other purposes for which such debt could be incurred. No purchaser of any bonds or notes of an interstate district shall be responsible in any way to see to the application of the proceeds thereof.

State Aid Programs. As used in this paragraph the term “initial aid” shall include New Hampshire and Vermont financial assistance with respect to a capital project, or the means of financing a capital project, which is available in connection with construction costs of a capital project or which is available at the time indebtedness is incurred to finance the project. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing definition, initial aid shall specifically include a New Hampshire state guarantee under RSA 195-B with respect to bonds or notes and Vermont construction aid under chapter 123 of this title. As used in this paragraph the term “long-term aid” shall include New Hampshire and Vermont financial assistance which is payable periodically in relation to capital costs incurred by an interstate district. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing definition, long-term aid shall specifically include New Hampshire school building aid under RSA 198 and Vermont school building aid under chapter 123 of this title. For the purpose of applying for, receiving and expending initial aid and long-term aid an interstate district shall be deemed a native school district by each state, subject to the following provisions. When an interstate district has appropriated money for a capital project, the amount appropriated shall be divided into a New Hampshire share and a Vermont share in accordance with the capital expense apportionment formula in the articles of agreement as though the total amount appropriated for the project was a capital expense requiring apportionment in the year the appropriation is made. New Hampshire initial aid shall be available with respect to the amount of the New Hampshire share as though it were authorized indebtedness of a New Hampshire cooperative school district. In the case of a state guarantee of interstate district bonds or notes under RSA 195-B, the interstate district shall be eligible to apply for and receive an unconditional state guarantee with respect to an amount of its bonds or notes which does not exceed 50 percent of the amount of the New Hampshire share as determined above. Vermont initial aid shall be available with respect to the amount of the Vermont share as though it were funds voted by a Vermont school district. Payments of Vermont initial aid shall be made to the interstate district, and the amount of any borrowing authorized to meet the appropriation for the capital project shall be reduced accordingly. New Hampshire and Vermont long-term aid shall be payable to the interstate district. The amounts of long-term aid in each year shall be based on the New Hampshire and Vermont shares of the amount of indebtedness of the interstate district which is payable in that year and which has been apportioned in accordance with the capital expense apportionment formula in the articles of agreement. The New Hampshire aid shall be payable at the rate of forty-five percent, if there are three or less New Hampshire members in the interstate district, and otherwise it shall be payable as though the New Hampshire members were a New Hampshire cooperative school district. New Hampshire and Vermont long-term aid shall be deducted from the total capital expenses for the fiscal year in which the long-term aid is payable, and the balance of such expenses shall be apportioned among the member districts. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, New Hampshire and Vermont may at any time change their state school aid programs that are in existence when this compact takes effect and may establish new programs, and any legislation for these purposes may specify how such programs shall be applied with respect to interstate districts. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the respective amounts of New Hampshire and Vermont initial and long-term aid, with respect to a capital project of the Dresden School District for which indebtedness is authorized by a vote of the District after July 1, 1977, shall be initially determined for each year for each member district by the manner provided in this paragraph and the aid shall be paid to the Dresden School District, however, the amount of aid for those capital projects received by the Dresden School District on account of each member district shall be used by the district to reduce the sums which would otherwise be required to be raised by taxation within that member district.

Tax Exemption. Bonds and notes of an interstate school district shall be exempt from local property taxes in both states, and the interest or discount thereon and any profit derived from the disposition thereof shall be exempt from personal income taxes in both states.

Notwithstanding paragraph G of this Article, initial and longterm aid may be allocated among the members of an interstate district other than the Dresden School District in the manner which is provided in the articles of agreement of that district, or if not therein provided, in the manner specified in paragraph G for all interstate districts other than the Dresden School District.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1977, No. 65

, §§ 1, 2;

2001, No. 63

, § 176a.

§ 778.
Taking over of existing property—Article VIII.

Power to Acquire Property of Member District. The articles of agreement, or an amendment thereof, may provide for the acquisition by an interstate district from a member district of all or a part of its existing plant and equipment.

Valuation. The articles of agreement, or the amendment, shall provide for the determination of the value of the property to be acquired in one or more of the following ways:

Reimbursement to Member District. The articles of agreement shall specify the method by which the member district shall be reimbursed by the interstate district for the property taken over, in one or more of the following ways:

a.

By one lump sum, appropriated, allocated, and raised by the interstate district in the same manner as an appropriation for operating expenses.

b.

In installments over a period of not more than twenty years, each of which is appropriated, allocated, and raised by the interstate district in the same manner as an appropriation for operating expenses.

A valuation set forth in the articles of agreement or the amendment.

By appraisal, in which case, one appraiser shall be appointed by each commissioner, and a third appraiser appointed by the first two appraisers.

By an agreement to assume or reimburse the member district for all principal and interest on any outstanding indebtedness originally incurred by the member district to finance the acquisition and improvement of the property, each such installment to be appropriated, allocated, and raised by the interstate district in the same manner as an appropriation for operating expenses.

The member district transferring the property shall have the same obligation to pay to the interstate district its share of the cost of such acquisition, but may offset its right to reimbursement.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 779.
Amendments to articles of agreement—Article IX.

Amendments to the articles of agreement shall be adopted in the manner provided in the articles of agreement, and if no such provision is made in the articles of agreement then amendments shall be adopted by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of those present and voting at an interstate district meeting, except that:

If the amendment proposes the addition of a new member district, the amendment shall be adopted in the same manner provided for the adoption of the original articles of agreement, provided that the planning committee shall consist of all of the members of the interstate district board of directors and all of the members of the school board of the proposed new member district or districts, and provided that the amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the interstate district, the affirmative vote of two-thirds of those present and voting at an interstate district meeting being required for approval of the amendment. The articles of agreement together with the proposed amendment shall then be submitted to the voters of the proposed new member district or districts, and an affirmative vote of a simple majority of those present and voting at each district meeting shall be required for approval of the amendment.

No amendment to the articles of agreement may impair the rights of bond or note holders or the power of the interstate district to procure the means for their payment.

Amendments to the articles of agreement of the Dresden School District shall be adopted in the following manner: (1) an amendment shall be initially approved upon the affirmative vote of a simple majority of those voters of the Dresden School District who are present and voting at a meeting called for such purpose, (2) the amendment initially approved by the voters of the Dresden School District shall become final and effective upon the expiration of thirty days after the date of that vote, unless a petition is duly filed within that thirty day period and the amendment is subsequently not approved by the voters of a member district in accordance with the procedure specified in clause (3), (3) if a petition, valid under applicable state law, is filed before the expiration of that thirty-day period with the clerk of any school district which is a member of the Dresden School District, which petition requires the calling of a special meeting of that member district for the purpose of considering the approval of the amendment initially adopted by the voters of the Dresden School District, then the board of school directors of that member district shall thereupon call a special meeting of that district for that purpose, (4) if the amendment as initially approved by the voters of the Dresden School District is approved by more than forty percent of the voters present and voting at the meeting of each member district in which a petition was filed under this section, then the amendment as initially adopted shall become final and effective upon the vote of that member district last to vote. If the amendment as initially approved by the voters of the Dresden School District is not so approved by more than forty percent of the voters present and voting at the meeting of any one member district, then the amendment shall be null and void and of no effect.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1977, No. 65

, § 3.

§ 780.
Applicability of New Hampshire laws—Article X.

General School Laws. With respect to the operation and maintenance of any school of the district located in New Hampshire, the provisions of New Hampshire law shall apply except as otherwise provided in this compact and except that the powers and duties of the school board shall be exercised and discharged by the interstate board and the powers and duties of the union superintendent shall be exercised and discharged by the interstate district superintendent.

New Hampshire State Aid. A New Hampshire school district shall be entitled to receive an amount of state aid for operating expenditures as though its share of the interstate district’s expenses were the expenses of the New Hampshire member district, and as though the New Hampshire member district pupils attending the interstate school were attending a New Hampshire cooperative school district’s school. The state aid shall be paid to the New Hampshire member school district to reduce the sums which would otherwise be required to be raised by taxation within the member district.

Continued Existence of the New Hampshire Member School District. A New Hampshire member school district shall continue in existence, and shall have all of the powers and be subject to all of the obligations imposed by law and not herein delegated to the interstate district. If the interstate district incorporates only a part of the schools in the member school district, then the school board of the member school district shall continue in existence and it shall have all of the powers and be subject to all of the obligations imposed by law on it and not herein delegated to the district. However, if all of the schools in the member school district are incorporated into the interstate school district, then the member or members of the interstate board representing the member district shall have all of the powers and be subject to all of the obligations imposed by law on the members of a school board for the member district and not herein delegated to the interstate district. The New Hampshire member school district shall remain liable on its existing indebtedness; and the interstate school district shall not become liable therefor, unless the indebtedness is specifically assumed in accordance with the articles of agreement. Any trust funds or capital reserve funds and any property not taken over by the interstate district shall be retained by the New Hampshire member district and held or disposed of according to law. If all of the schools in a member district are incorporated into an interstate district, then no annual meeting of the member district shall be required unless the members of the interstate board from the member district shall determine that there is occasion for such an annual meeting.

Suit and Service of Process in New Hampshire. The courts of New Hampshire shall have the same jurisdiction over the district as though a New Hampshire member district were a party instead of the interstate district. The service necessary to institute suit in New Hampshire shall be made on the district by leaving a copy of the writ or other proceedings in hand or at the last and usual place of abode of one of the directors who reside in New Hampshire, and by mailing a like copy to the clerk and to one other director by certified mail with return receipt requested.

Employment. Each employee of an interstate district assigned to a school located in New Hampshire shall be considered an employee of a New Hampshire school district for the purpose of the New Hampshire teachers’ retirement system, the New Hampshire state employees’ retirement system, the New Hampshire workers’ compensation law and any other law relating to the regulation of employment or the provision of benefits for employees of New Hampshire school districts except as follows:

A teacher in a New Hampshire member district may elect to remain a member of the New Hampshire teachers’ retirement system, even though assigned to teach in an interstate school in Vermont.

Employees of interstate districts designated as professional or instructional staff members, as defined in article I hereof, may elect to participate in the teachers’ retirement system of either the State of New Hampshire or the State of Vermont but in no case will they participate in both retirement systems simultaneously.

It shall be the duty of the superintendent in an interstate district to: (a) advise teachers and other professional staff employees contracted for the district about the terms of the contract and the policies and procedure of the retirement systems; (b) see that each teacher or professional staff employee selects the retirement system of his or her choice at the time his or her contract is signed; (c) provide the commissioners of education in New Hampshire and in Vermont with the names and other pertinent information regarding each staff member under his or her jurisdiction so that each may be enrolled in the retirement system of his or her preference.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1981, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 781.
Applicability of Vermont laws—Article XI.

General School Laws. With respect to the operation and maintenance of any school of the district located in Vermont, the provisions of Vermont law shall apply except as otherwise provided in this compact and except that the powers and duties of the school board shall be exercised and discharged by the interstate board and the powers and duties of the union superintendent shall be exercised and discharged by the interstate district superintendent.

Vermont State Aid. A Vermont school district shall be entitled to receive such amount of State aid for operating expenditures as though its share of the interstate district’s expenses were the expenses of the Vermont member district, and as though the Vermont member district pupils attending the interstate schools were attending a Vermont union school district’s schools. Such State aid shall be paid to the Vermont member school district to reduce the sums which would otherwise be required to be raised by taxation within the member district.

Continued Existence of Vermont Member School District. A Vermont member school district shall continue in existence, and shall have all of the powers and be subject to all of the obligations imposed by law and not herein delegated to the interstate district. If the interstate district incorporates only a part of the schools in the member school district, then the school board of the member school district shall continue in existence and it shall have all of the powers and be subject to all of the obligations imposed by law on it and not herein delegated to the district. However, if all of the schools in the member school district are incorporated into the interstate school district, then the member or members of the interstate board representing the member district shall have all of the powers and be subject to all of the obligations imposed by law on the members of a school board for the member district and not herein delegated to the interstate district. The Vermont member school district shall remain liable on its existing indebtedness; and the interstate school district shall not become liable therefor. Any trust funds and any property not taken over shall be retained by the Vermont member school district and held or disposed of according to law.

Suit and Service of Process in Vermont. The courts of Vermont shall have the same jurisdiction over the districts as though a Vermont member district were a party instead of the interstate district. The service necessary to institute suit in Vermont shall be made on the district by serving one of the directors who resides in Vermont, and by mailing a like copy to the clerk and to one other director by certified mail with return receipt requested.

Employment. Each employee of an interstate district assigned to a school located in Vermont shall be considered an employee of a Vermont school district for the purpose of the State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont, the State Employees’ Retirement System, the Vermont workers’ compensation law, and any other law relating to the regulation of employment or the provision of benefits for employees of Vermont school districts except as follows:

A teacher in a Vermont member district may elect to remain a member of the State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont, even though assigned to teach in an interstate school in New Hampshire.

Employees of interstate districts designated as professional or instructional staff members, as defined in article I hereof, may elect to participate in the teachers’ retirement system of either the State of Vermont or the State of New Hampshire but in no case will they participate in both retirement systems simultaneously.

It shall be the duty of the superintendent in an interstate district to: (a) advise teachers and other professional staff employees contracted for the district about the terms of the contract and the policies and procedures of the retirement system; (b) see that each teacher or professional staff employee selects the retirement system of his choice at the time his contract is signed; (c) provide the commissioners of education in New Hampshire and in Vermont with the names and other pertinent information regarding each staff member under his jurisdiction so that each may be enrolled in the retirement system of his preference.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 183, eff. March 29, 1972;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 782.
Adoption of compact by Dresden School District—Article XII.

The Dresden School District, otherwise known as the Hanover-Norwich Interstate School District, authorized by New Hampshire laws of 1961, chapter 116, and by the laws of Vermont, is hereby authorized to adopt the provisions of this compact and to become an interstate school district within the meaning hereof, upon the following conditions and subject to the following limitations:

Articles of agreement shall be prepared and signed by a majority of the directors of the interstate school district.

The articles of agreement shall be submitted to an annual or special meeting of the Dresden district for adoption.

An affirmative vote of two-thirds of those present and voting shall be required for adoption.

Nothing contained therein, or in this compact, as it affects the Dresden School District shall affect adversely the rights of the holders of any bonds or other evidences of indebtedness then outstanding, or the rights of the district to procure the means for payment thereof previously authorized.

The corporate existence of the Dresden School District shall not be terminated by such adoption of articles of amendment, but shall be deemed to be so amended that it shall thereafter be governed by the terms of this compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 783.
Miscellaneous provisions—Article XIII.

Studies. Insofar as practicable, the studies required by the laws of both states shall be offered in an interstate school district.

Textbooks. Textbooks and scholar’s supplies shall be provided at the expense of the interstate district for pupils attending its schools.

Transportation. The allocation of the cost of transportation in an interstate school district, as between the interstate district and the member districts, shall be determined by the articles of agreement.

Location of Schoolhouses. In any case where a new schoolhouse or other school facility is to be constructed or acquired, the interstate board shall first determine whether it shall be located in New Hampshire or in Vermont. If it is to be located in New Hampshire, RSA 199, relating to schoolhouses, shall apply. If it is to be located in Vermont, the Vermont law relating to schoolhouses shall apply.

Fiscal Year. The fiscal year of each interstate district shall begin on July first of each year and end on June thirtieth of the following year.

Immunity from Tort Liability. Notwithstanding the fact that an interstate district may derive income from operating profit, fees, rentals, and other services, it shall be immune from suit and from liability for injury to persons or property and for other torts caused by it or its agents, servants or independent contractors, except insofar as it may have undertaken such liability under RSA 281:7 relating to workers’ compensation, or RSA 412:3 relating to the procurement of liability insurance by a governmental agency and except insofar as it may have undertaken such liability under

21 V.S.A. § 621

relating to workers’ compensation or

29 V.S.A. § 1403

relating to the procurement of liability insurance by a governmental agency.

Administrative Agreement Between Commissioners of Education. The commissioners of education of New Hampshire and Vermont may enter into one or more administrative agreements prescribing the relationship between the interstate districts, member districts, and each of the two state departments of education, in which any conflicts between the two states in procedure, regulations, and administrative practices may be resolved.

Amendments. Neither state shall amend its legislation or any agreement authorized thereby without the consent of the other in such manner as to substantially adversely affect the rights of the other state or its people hereunder, or as to substantially impair the rights of the holders of any bonds or notes or other evidences of indebtedness then outstanding or the rights of an interstate school district to procure the means for payment thereof. Subject to the foregoing, any reference herein to other statutes of either state shall refer to such statute as it may be amended or revised from time to time.

Separability. If any of the provisions of this compact, or legislation enabling the same, shall be held invalid or unconstitutional in relation to any of the applications thereof, such invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other applications thereof or other provisions thereof; and to this end the provisions of this compact are declared to be severable.

Inconsistency of Language. The validity of this compact shall not be affected by any insubstantial differences in its form or language as adopted by the two states.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 784.
Effective date—Article XIV.

This compact shall become effective when passed by the Vermont General Assembly, signed by the Governor and approved by the United States Congress.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.).